Arkansas, session 2025, SB613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 116, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 9 - Fluoridation Election

14-116-901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Canvasser” means a person who circulates a fluoridation
election petition or a petition part to obtain the signatures of petitioners;
(2) “Paid canvasser” means a canvasser who is paid or with whom
there is an agreement to pay money or anything of value before or after a
signature on a fluoridation election petition is solicited in exchange for
soliciting or obtaining a signature on a fluoridation election petition;
(3) “Petition part” means a petition signature sheet containing
the information required under this subchapter;
(4) “Petitioner” means a person who signs a petition requesting
*SSS296*
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
a fluoridation election;
(5) "Public water system" means a facility, including without
limitation a parent system, consecutive system, or other system, that holds,
treats, and supplies water directly or through a consecutive system or
consecutive systems to five thousand (5,000) persons or more;
(6) “Registered voter” means a person who is registered at the
time of signing the petition under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51; and
(7) “Sponsor” means a person who arranges for the circulation of
a fluoridation election petition or who files a fluoridation election
petition with the official charged with verifying the signatures on the
fluoridation election petition.

14-116-902. Petition to determine fluoridation of water in public
water system.
(a) An election to determine fluoridation of water in a public water
system shall be called by a petition signed by registered voters supplied by
the public water system in a number equal to thirty-eight percent (38%) of
the registered voters supplied by the public water system.
(b) A fluoridation election petition under subsection (a) of this
section shall be filed with the county clerk of the county where the public
water system is domiciled at least one hundred twenty (120) days before:
(1) In even-numbered years, the preferential primary election or
the general election; and
(2) In odd-numbered years, the date of the special election as
provided under § 14-116-913.
(c) The county clerk of the county where the public water system is
domiciled shall:
(1) Coordinate with the county clerks of other counties supplied
by the public water system to verify the signatures on a petition filed under
subsection (b) of this section; and
(2) Determine the sufficiency of a petition filed under
subsection (b) of this section no later than ten (10) days after the petition
is submitted.
(d) The total number of registered voters as certified by the county
clerk to the Secretary of State by June 1 of each year under Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 51, is the basis on which the required number of
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
signatures of qualified electors on a petition filed under this section shall
be computed.
(e)(1) The sponsor shall request that the board of the public water
system provide an accurate boundary map by parcel for the purpose of counting
signatures and conducting the election to the county clerk of the county
where the public water system is domiciled.
(2) The public water system shall provide the boundary map
requested under subdivision (e)(1) of this section to the county clerk of the
county where the public water system is domiciled at or before the time for
filing the petition.

14-116-903. Duties of election officers — Penalty for failure to
perform.
(a) The duties imposed by this subchapter on members of the State
Board of Election Commissioners, members of the county boards of election
commissioners, election officials, and other officers expressly named in this
subchapter shall be performed:
(1) In good faith;
(2) Within the time provided by this subchapter; and
(3) In the manner provided by this subchapter.
(b) If a member of a county board of election commissioners, an
election official, or another officer charged with a duty under this
subchapter knowingly fails to perform that duty, upon conviction he or she
shall be guilty of a violation and shall be:
(1) Fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than
one thousand dollars ($1,000); and
(2) Removed from his or her position or office.

14-116-904. Hiring and training of paid canvassers.
(a)(1) A person shall not provide money or anything of value to
another person for obtaining signatures on a fluoridation election petition
unless the person receiving the money or item of value meets the requirements
of this section.
(2) Before a signature is solicited by a paid canvasser, the
sponsor shall:
(A) Explain the Arkansas law applicable to obtaining
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
signatures on a fluoridation election petition to the paid canvasser; and
(B)(i) Provide a complete list under subdivision
(a)(2)(B)(i) of this section of all paid canvassers' names and current
residential addresses to the county clerk.
(ii) If additional paid canvassers agree to solicit
signatures on behalf of a sponsor after the complete list is provided, the
sponsor shall provide an updated list of all paid canvassers' names and
current residential addresses to the county clerk.
(b) Before obtaining a signature on a fluoridation election petition
as a paid canvasser, a person shall submit in person or by mail to the
sponsor:
(1) The full name and any assumed name of the person;
(2) The current residence address of the person and the person's
permanent domicile address if the person's permanent domicile address is
different from the person's current residence address;
(3) A signed statement taken under oath or solemn affirmation
that states that the person has not pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or
been found guilty of a criminal offense involving a violation of the election
laws, fraud, forgery, or identification theft in any state;
(4) A signed statement that the person has read and understands
the Arkansas law applicable to obtaining signatures on a fluoridation
election petition; and
(5) A photograph of the person taken within ninety (90) days of
the submission of the information required under this section.
(c) A sponsor shall maintain the information required under this
section for each paid canvasser for three (3) years after the general
election or special election in which the fluoridation election is called.

14-116-905. Signing of petition — Penalty for falsification — Notice
of suspected forgery.
(a)(1) A person signing a petition under this subchapter shall:
(A) Be a registered voter supplied by the public water
system; and
(B) After reading the ballot title of the petition in the
presence of the canvasser or having the ballot title of the petition read
aloud to him or her in the presence of the canvasser, sign his or her own
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
name and in his or her own handwriting print his or her own name, address,
and birthdate and the date of signing on a petition.
(2) If a person signing a petition under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section requires assistance due to a disability, another person:
(A) May print the person's name, address, and birthdate
and the date of signing; and
(B) Shall sign and print his or her own name in the margin
of the petition.
(3) A person who is under eighteen (18) years of age shall not
act as a canvasser.
(4) A person acting as a canvasser shall not obtain a signature
for a petition without disclosing to the potential petitioner that petition
fraud is a criminal offense before the potential petitioner signs the
petition in the custody of the canvasser by:
(A) Verbal notification; or
(B) If verbal notification is impossible, written
notification with a document that is provided separately from all other
petition materials.
(b) A person commits a Class A misdemeanor if the person, acting as a
canvasser, notary, sponsor, or agent of a sponsor knowingly:
(1) Signs a name other than his or her own to a petition;
(2) Prints a name, address, or birthdate other than his or her
own on a petition unless the petitioner requires assistance due to a
disability and the person complies with this section;
(3) Solicits or obtains a signature to a petition knowing that
the petitioner is not qualified to sign the petition;
(4) Pays a person any form of compensation in exchange for
signing a petition as a petitioner;
(5) Accepts or pays money or anything of value for obtaining
signatures on a petition when the person acting as a canvasser, sponsor, or
agent of a sponsor knows that the name or address of the person acting as a
canvasser is not included on the sponsor's list filed with the county clerk;
(6) As a sponsor, files a petition part with the official
charged with verifying the signatures knowing that the petition part contains
one (1) or more false or fraudulent signatures unless each false or
fraudulent signature is clearly stricken by the sponsor before filing;
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
(7) As a canvasser, knowingly accepts a signature when the
person signing the petition has not read the ballot title of the petition in
the presence of the canvasser or the ballot title of the petition has not
been read aloud to the person in the presence of the canvasser; or
(8) As a canvasser, fails to disclose to a potential petitioner
that petition fraud is a criminal offense before the potential petitioner
signs the petition in the custody of the canvasser under subdivision (a)(4)
of this section.
(c) When the county clerk charged with verifying the signatures has
reasonable grounds to believe that one (1) or more signatures on a petition
is forged, the county clerk shall report the suspected forgery and the basis
for suspecting forgery to the prosecuting attorney of the county.
(d)(1) The county clerk shall not count signatures collected and
witnessed by a canvasser if the county clerk finds by a preponderance of the
evidence that the canvasser has violated Arkansas laws regarding canvassing,
perjury, forgery, or fraudulent practices in the procurement of petition
signatures or any provision of the Arkansas Constitution applicable to the
collection of signatures on a fluoridation election petition during the
current election cycle.
(2) This subsection shall not constrain the duties and authority
of the county clerk as set forth in Arkansas law.

14-116-906. Form of initiative petition — Sufficiency of signatures.
(a) The petition for an ordinance, act, or amendment proposed by
initiative under this subchapter shall be on substantially the following
form:
“PETITION FOR FLUORIDATION ELECTION
To the Honorable_____________,
County Clerk
We, the undersigned registered voters of the State of Arkansas, of
_____________ County, Arkansas, respectfully request that an election be held
to determine fluoridation of the water in the public water system in the
district described below, to the end that the same may be adopted, enacted,
or rejected by the vote of the registered voters supplied by the public water
system. Each of us for himself or herself says:
I have personally signed this petition; I am a registered voter of
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
_____________ County, Arkansas, and my printed name, date of birth,
residence, and city or town of residence and the date of signing this
petition are correctly written after my signature.
(Here insert a description of the public water system in which the
election shall be held.)”.
(b)(1) The information provided by the petitioner under this
subchapter may be used as evidence of the validity or invalidity of the
signature.
(2) If a signature of a registered voter on a petition under
this subchapter is sufficient to verify the registered voter's name, then it
shall not be adjudged invalid for failure to sign the name or write the
residence and city or town of residence exactly as it appears on voter
registration records, for failure to print the name in the space provided,
for failure to provide the correct date of birth, nor for failure to provide
the correct date of signing the petition, all the information being an aid to
verification rather than a mandatory requirement to perfect the validity of
the signature of the petitioner.
(c) Additional sheets of petitioner signatures shall not be attached
to a petition under this subchapter unless the sheets contain the full
language of the petition.
(d)(1) The signature section of a petition under this subchapter shall
be formatted and shall contain the number of signature lines prescribed by
the county clerk.
(2) Before the circulation of a petition for signatures under
this subchapter, the sponsor shall file a printed petition part with the
county clerk in the form that will be used for obtaining signatures.

14-116-907. Procedure for circulation of petition.
(a)(1) Each petition under this subchapter for an election to be held
for a public water system that includes more than one (1) county shall be
prepared and circulated in a petition part, and each petition part shall be
an exact copy of all other petition parts on which signatures of petitioners
are to be solicited.
(2) When a sufficient number of petition parts are signed by the
requisite number of registered voters and are filed and certified by the
county clerk, they shall be treated and considered as one (1) petition.
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
(b) Each petition part under this subchapter shall have attached to it
the affidavit of the canvasser who collected the signatures on the petition
part stating that:
(1) The canvasser's current residence address appearing on the
verification is correct;
(2) All signatures appearing on the petition part were made in
the presence of the canvasser; and
(3) To the best of the canvasser's knowledge and belief each
signature is genuine and each person signing is a registered voter.
(c) A petition part under this section shall not contain signatures of
petitioners from more than one (1) county.

14-116-908. Form of verification — Penalty for false statement.
(a) Each petition under this subchapter that contains signatures shall
be verified in substantially the following form by the canvasser's affidavit
on the petition as a part of the petition:
“State of Arkansas, County of _____________
I, _____________ (print name of canvasser) _____________, being duly
sworn, state that each of the foregoing persons signed his or her own name to
this sheet of the petition in my presence. To the best of my knowledge and
belief, each signature is genuine and each signer is a registered voter of
_____________ County. At all times during the circulation of this signature
sheet, an exact copy of the popular name, ballot title, and text was attached
to the signature sheet, and each signer read the ballot title of the petition
or had the ballot title of the petition read to the signer in my presence. My
current residence address is correctly stated below.
Signature_____________
Residence _____________
Indicate one: _____________ Paid Canvasser _____________
Volunteer/Unpaid Canvasser
Subscribed and sworn to before me this _____________day of
_____________, 20_____________
Signature_____________
Clerk, Notary, Judge, or Justice of the Peace
Seal_____________ ”.
(b)(1) If the form provided under subsection (a) of this section is
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
substantially followed in a petition, the form is sufficient.
(2) A form provided under this section shall not be held
insufficient for clerical and merely technical errors.
(c)(1) A petition under this subchapter shall not be disqualified due
to clerical or technical errors made by a clerk, notary, judge, or justice of
the peace when verifying a canvasser's signature.
(2) A petition under this subchapter shall not be disqualified
for the failure of a clerk, notary, judge, or justice of the peace to sign
exactly as his or her name appears on his or her seal if the signature of a
clerk, notary, judge, or justice of the peace is sufficient to verify his or
her name.
(d) A canvasser who knowingly makes a false statement on a petition
verification form required by this section upon conviction is guilty of a
Class D felony.
(e)(1) A canvasser who witnesses signatures on a petition part shall
view a copy of a potential petitioner's photo identification to verify the
identity of the potential petitioner before obtaining the signature.
(2) If a canvasser cannot verify the identity of the potential
petitioner, the canvasser shall not obtain a signature from the potential
petitioner.
(3) A canvasser who submits a canvasser affidavit under
subsection (a) of this section swearing that to the best of the canvasser's
knowledge and belief each signature is genuine and that the person signing is
a registered voter, but does not comply with the requirements under
subdivision (e)(1) of this section, makes a false statement on the petition
verification form.
(4) As used in this subsection, "photo identification" means a
document or identification card permitted under § 7-1-101(40).

14-116-909. Failure to act on petition — Mandamus — Injunction.
(a) If a county clerk does not examine and certify a petition under
this subchapter within the time prescribed in § 14-116-902, the sponsor may
apply to the circuit court with jurisdiction for appropriate relief.
(b) If the circuit court decides that the petition under this
subchapter is legally sufficient, the circuit court shall order the county
clerk to certify the sufficiency of the petition and set an election date.
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
(c) On a proper showing that a petition under this subchapter is not
sufficient, the circuit court may enjoin the county clerk from:
(1) Certifying the sufficiency of the petition; or
(2) Setting an election date.

14-116-910. Preservation of records.
(a) All petitions, notices, certificates, or other documentary
evidence of procedural steps taken under this subchapter shall be filed and
preserved.
(b) A petition under this subchapter with signatures shall be retained
for two (2) years after submission to the county clerk.

14-116-911. Count of signatures.
(a) Upon the initial filing of a petition under this subchapter, the
county clerk charged with verifying the signatures shall:
(1) Perform an initial count of the signatures; and
(2) Determine whether the petition contains, on its face and
before verification of the signatures of registered voters, the designated
number of signatures required by the Arkansas Constitution and this
subchapter in order to call an election.
(b) A petition part and all signatures appearing on the petition part
shall not be counted for any purpose by the official charged with verifying
the signatures, including the initial count of signatures, if one (1) or more
of the following is true:
(1) The petition is not an original petition, including without
limitation a petition that is a photocopy or a fax;
(2) The petition lacks the signature, printed name, and
residence address of the canvasser or is signed by more than one (1)
canvasser;
(3) The canvasser is a paid canvasser whose name and the
information required under § 14-116-904 were not submitted by the sponsor to
the county clerk before the petitioner signed the petition;
(4) The canvasser verification is not notarized, is notarized by
more than one (1) notary, or lacks a notary signature or a notary seal;
(5) The canvasser verification is dated earlier than the date on
which a petitioner signed the petition;
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
(6) The petition part clearly contains signatures of petitioners
from more than one (1) county unless each signature of a petitioner from
another county is clearly stricken before the filing of the petition with the
county clerk; or
(7) The petition part has a material defect that, on its face,
renders the petition part invalid.
(c) The following signatures shall not be counted by the official
charged with verifying the signatures, including the initial count of
signatures:
(1) A signature that is not an original signature;
(2) A signature that is obviously not that of the purported
petitioner;
(3) A signature that is illegible and is accompanied by no
personally identifying information;
(4) A signature for which the corresponding printed name,
address, or birthdate is written by someone other than the petitioner except
under circumstances of disability of the signer;
(5) A signature that has any other material defect that, on its
face, renders the signature invalid; and
(6) A signature submitted by a canvasser who has not filed a
true affidavit with the county clerk as required under subdivision (d)(1) of
this section certifying that the canvasser has complied with the Arkansas
Constitution and all Arkansas laws regarding canvassing, perjury, forgery,
and fraudulent practices in the procurement of petition signatures during the
current election cycle.
(d)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (d)(4) of this section, a
canvasser shall file a true affidavit with the county clerk certifying that
the canvasser has complied with the Arkansas Constitution and all Arkansas
laws regarding canvassing, perjury, forgery, and fraudulent practices in the
procurement of petition signatures during the current election cycle.
(2) The county clerk shall not count the signatures submitted by
a canvasser until a true affidavit is submitted by the canvasser under
subdivision (d)(1) of this section.
(3) A true affidavit submitted under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section shall have no bearing to establish the genuineness or falsity of the
signatures obtained by the canvasser.
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
(4)(A) The inability of a canvasser to submit an affidavit due
to death or medical disability shall not disqualify the signatures gathered
by the canvasser.
(B) Subdivision (d)(4)(A) of this section does not excuse
a canvasser from filing the affidavit required under § 14-116-908.
(e) A canvasser who has filed a true affidavit under subsection (d) of
this section shall not collect additional signatures unless the county clerk
determines that the sponsor of the fluoridation election petition is eligible
to solicit and add additional signatures to the petition under § 14–14–
915(e).

14-116-912. Notification of election.
(a) Notice of an election under this subchapter shall be given by the
secretary of the board of directors of the public water system at least
thirty (30) days before the date fixed for the election by publication of a
notice for at least two (2) consecutive weekly insertions in a newspaper
published and having a bona fide circulation in each of the counties supplied
by the public water system.
(b) The notice of election shall be in substantially the following
form:
“NOTICE OF ELECTION
Notice is hereby given that an election will be held in ............. County,
Arkansas, on the ............. day of ............., 20............., for the
purpose of determining whether the Board of Directors of the .............
Public Water System shall be authorized to change the status of water
fluoridation in the public water system, and whether the Board of Directors
of the public water system shall be authorized to exercise the powers
conferred on the public water system under Arkansas Code § 14-116-901 et seq.
to carry out the results of the election. The voting places in .............
County, Arkansas, for this election shall be as follows: (Here will be
inserted the various voting places of the county in which the particular
notice is published.)”.
(c) The notice required under this section shall be dated and signed
by the secretary of the board of directors of the public water system.

14-116-913. Conduct of election.
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
(a)(1)(A) The county board of election commissioners of the particular
county shall cause the question of a change in status of the water
fluoridation in a public water system to be placed on the ballot:
(i) In even-numbered years, at the general election
or preferential primary election; or
(ii) In odd-numbered years, at the special election
that shall be held on the second Tuesday of March or November.
(B) An election held under subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ii) of
this section that is scheduled to occur in a month in which the second
Tuesday is a legal holiday shall be held on the third Tuesday of the month.
(2) The question shall be presented in the following form:
" FOR THE FLUORIDATION OF WATER IN [DESCRIPTION OF THE
PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM]
AGAINST THE FLUORIDATION OF WATER IN [DESCRIPTION OF
THE PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM].".
(3) Each elector shall be instructed on the ballot to vote "FOR"
or "AGAINST" the question by placing an appropriate mark.
(b) The county board of election commissioners shall count the votes
cast on the question submitted to the voters under this section to determine
the fluoridation of water in the public water system and shall deliver its
certificate declaring the result of the election, together with the election
returns, within three (3) days after the date of the election to the county
clerk of the county.
(c) Upon petition of twenty-five (25) interested registered voters in
the territory affected, within ten (10) days after the date of an election
under this section, the county board of election commissioners shall
immediately recount the votes and declare the result of the election as
determined by the recount.
(d) Within twenty (20) days after an election under this section, the
county court shall make and have entered on record its order declaring the
result of the election.
(e)(1) The costs of an election held under this subchapter shall be
paid by the board of directors of the public water system.
(2) The county clerk of each county holding an election to
determine the fluoridation of the water in the public water system shall
provide an invoice to the board of directors of the public water system for
04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296

SB613
any expenses incurred by the county in connection with an election under this
subchapter.

14-116-914. Results of election.
(a) If a majority of the registered voters supplied by the public
water system elect to prohibit fluoridation of water under this subchapter,
the public water system shall cease fluoridation of the water within thirty
(30) days of the certification of the election results.
(b) A subsequent election in the public water system under this
subchapter shall not be held earlier than four (4) years after an election is
held under this subchapter.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-7-136(b), concerning a statewide
fluoridation program, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The Unless prohibited by the results of an election under § 14-
116-901 et seq., the company, corporation, municipality, county, government
agency, or other entity that owns or controls a water system shall control
the quantity of fluoride in the water so as to maintain a fluoride content
established by the Department of Health.

















04/02/2025 4:12:25 PM SSS296